csv2fst/yaml_output/VII_CNJ_d.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
     
Tests:

  Lemma - ALL :

     zanagad+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0SgProx/0PlProx: zanagak
     zanagad+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0SgObv/0PlObv: zanagadinig
     zanagad+VII+Cnj+Neg+Neu+0SgProx/0PlProx: zanagasinog
     zanagad+VII+Cnj+Neg+Neu+0SgObv/0PlObv: zanagasininig
     zanagad+VII+Cnj+Pos+Prt+0SgProx/0PlProx: zanagakiban
     zanagad+VII+Cnj+Pos+Prt+0SgObv/0PlObv: zanagadinigiban
     zanagad+VII+Cnj+Neg+Prt+0SgProx/0PlProx: zanagasinoogiban
     zanagad+VII+Cnj+Neg+Prt+0SgObv/0PlObv: zanagasininigiban
     zanagad+VII+Cnj+Pos+Dub+0SgProx/0PlProx: zanagadogwen
     zanagad+VII+Cnj+Pos+Dub+0SgObv/0PlObv: zanagadinigwen
     zanagad+VII+Cnj+Neg+Dub+0SgProx/0PlProx: zanagasinoogwen
     zanagad+VII+Cnj+Neg+Dub+0SgObv/0PlObv: zanagasininiigwen
     zanagad+VII+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+0SgProx/0PlProx: zanagadogobanen
     zanagad+VII+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+0SgObv/0PlObv: zanagadinigobanen
     zanagad+VII+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+0SgProx/0PlProx: zanagasinoogobanen
     zanagad+VII+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+0SgObv/0PlObv: zanagasininigobanen
